Washington statutes.
RCW 18.227.020

Department rule-making authority.

The department shall collaborate with the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences and consult with other stakeholders to develop rules to implement this chapter by January 1, 2025, which shall be consistent with the University of Washington behavioral health support specialist clinical training program guidelines, and shall include appropriate standards for approval of educational programs for behavioral health support specialists, which shall include a practicum component and may be integrated into a bachelor's degree program or structured as a postbaccalaureate continuing education program or registered apprenticeship in combination with an approved bachelor's degree or postbaccalaureate certificate.

[ 2023 c 270 s 3.]